Alabama, session 2026rs, HB655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the period beginning April 15, 2026
until June 15, 2026, the state excise taxes on gasoline and
motor fuels levied pursuant to Sections 40-17-325 and
40-17-370, Code of Alabama 1975, shall be suspended.
(b) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules to
implement this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1